District of Columbia statutes.
3-417

Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, or rules or regulations issued pursuant to this chapter shall, upon conviction thereof, be subject to a fine of not less than $300 or more than $1,000, or imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both. Each act of unlawful practice shall constitute a distinct and separate offense. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or the rules or regulations issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infractions shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 18, 31 DCR 1815
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 404, 32 DCR 4450
1981 Ed., § 2-2817.